Illinois, session 104th, HB2599.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Children and Family Services Act is amended 5by changing Section 5e as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 505/5e)7    Sec. 5e. Advocacy Office for Children and Families. 8    (a) The Department of Children and Family Services shall 9establish and maintain an Advocacy Office for Children and 10Families that shall, in addition to other duties assigned by 11the Director, receive and respond to complaints that may be 12filed by children, parents, caretakers, and relatives of 13children receiving child welfare services from the Department 14of Children and Family Services or its agents. The Department 15shall promulgate policies and procedures for filing, 16processing, investigating, and resolving the complaints. The 17Department shall make a final report to the complainant of its 18findings. If a final report is not completed, the Department 19shall report on its disposition every 30 days.20    (b) If a youth in care, current foster parent or 21caregiver, or caseworker requests the information, the 22Advocacy Office shall make available the name, electronic mail 23address, and telephone number for each youth's court-appointed   HB2599- 2 -LRB104 10344 JRC 20418 b1guardian ad litem and, if applicable, the guardian ad litem's 2supervisor. 3    (c) The Advocacy Office shall include a statewide 4toll-free telephone number and an electronic mail address that 5may be used to file complaints, to obtain information about 6the delivery of child welfare services by the Department or 7its agents, and to obtain the contact information for the 8guardian ad litem. This telephone number and electronic mail 9address shall be included in all appropriate notices and 10handbooks regarding services available through the Department.11    (d) The Department shall provide a flyer to all youth 12entering care describing the responsibilities of the Advocacy 13Office listed in this Section, the toll-free telephone number 14and electronic mailing address for the Advocacy Office, and a 15description of the role of a guardian ad litem. The Department 16shall also provide this flyer to youth at every administrative 17case review. 18    (e) The Advocacy Office shall designate for each foster 19child an employee with legal knowledge of the foster process 20to guide foster parents throughout the foster process and keep 21them informed of their rights and responsibilities. 22(Source: P.A. 102-208, eff. 7-30-21.) 23    Section 10. The Foster Parent Law is amended by changing 24Section 1-30 as follows:   HB2599- 3 -LRB104 10344 JRC 20418 b1    (20 ILCS 520/1-30)2    Sec. 1-30. No private right of action or claim. Nothing in 3this Law shall be construed to create a private right of action 4or claim on the part of any individual or child welfare agency, 5except for paragraphs (6), (7.5), (10), and (11) of Section 61-15 of this Act.7(Source: P.A. 89-19, eff. 6-3-95.)